Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-344
Rules and regulations; use by public.

The commission may permit the use of all or a part of the areas within the state park system by the public and is authorized to adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations pertaining to the use, care, and administration of the units of such a system.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 9, p. 1467;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.29;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 102.